Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-311
Formation of district; mailing of notice; requirements.

The county clerk, city clerk, clerk of any political subdivision, except any city of the metropolitan class, or any other person upon whom the duty is imposed by law to publish notice required by law in regard to the formation of a special taxing district for public works or public improvements shall mail by certified mail with return receipt requested a copy of the published notice in regard to the formation of any special taxing district within the county, city, or other political subdivision, except any city of the metropolitan class, to the last-known address as shown on the current tax rolls of each nonresident property owner.

Laws 1973, LB 344, § 2;

Laws 1974, LB 655, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-1217.